dictionaries/sa/index.aff
SET UTF-8
COMPOUNDFLAG X
MAXCPDSUGS 0

TRY आईऊऐऔखघछझठढणनथधफभशषक्षज्ञ

IGNORE ॑

BREAK 35
BREAK -
BREAK ऽ$
BREAK ः$
BREAK ाः$
BREAK ैः$
BREAK ं$
BREAK ां$
BREAK े$
BREAK ेन$
BREAK ्स$
BREAK ्य$
BREAK ैव$
BREAK ेण$
BREAK ीय$
BREAK त्व$
BREAK च$
BREAK ता$
BREAK ति$
BREAK तः$
BREAK तं$
BREAK त्$
BREAK तु$
BREAK म्$
BREAK ^सु
BREAK ^अ
BREAK ^प्र
BREAK ाभ्याम्$
BREAK भ्याम्$
BREAK भ्यः$
BREAK भिः$
BREAK षु$
BREAK ाव$
BREAK नाम्$
BREAK योः$
BREAK ेभ्यः$

SFX e Y 155
SFX e ा ः ा
SFX e ा योः ा
SFX e ा ि ा
SFX e ा े ा
SFX e ा ेभ्यः ा
SFX e ा ै ा
SFX e ा ोः ा
SFX e ा ौ ा
SFX e ि यः ि
SFX e ि ये ि
SFX e ि यो ि
SFX e ि ी ि
SFX e ि ीणाम् ि
SFX e ि ीनाम् ि
SFX e ि ीन् ि
SFX e ि ीभ्यः ि
SFX e ि ीभ्याम् ि
SFX e ि ीषु ि
SFX e ि े ि
SFX e ि ेः ि
SFX e ि ौ ि
SFX e ि ्या ि
SFX e ि ्याः ि
SFX e ि ्याम् ि
SFX e ि ्युः ि
SFX e ि ्ये ि
SFX e ि ्योः ि
SFX e ि ्यौ ि
SFX e ी ा ी
SFX e ी ायः ी
SFX e ी ायम् ी
SFX e ी ायौ ी
SFX e ी ि ी
SFX e ी ्यः ी
SFX e ी ्या ी
SFX e ी ्याः ी
SFX e ी ्याम् ी
SFX e ी ्यि ी
SFX e ी ्युः ी
SFX e ी ्ये ी
SFX e ी ्यै ी
SFX e ी ्योः ी
SFX e ी ्यौ ी
SFX e ीभ ः ीभ
SFX e ु वः ु
SFX e ु वे ु
SFX e ु ू ु
SFX e ु ूः ु
SFX e ु ूनाम् ु
SFX e ु ूनि ु
SFX e ु ून् ु
SFX e ु ो ु
SFX e ु ोः ु
SFX e ु ौ ु
SFX e ु ौः ु
SFX e ु ्वा ु
SFX e ु ्वोः ु
SFX e ुन : ुन
SFX e ू ु ू
SFX e ू ुवः ू
SFX e ू ुवम् ू
SFX e ू ुवा ू
SFX e ू ुवि ू
SFX e ू ुवे ू
SFX e ू ुवोः ू
SFX e ू ुवौ ू
SFX e ू ुषु ू
SFX e ू ्वः ू
SFX e ू ्वा ू
SFX e ू ्वाः ू
SFX e ू ्वाम् ू
SFX e ू ्वै ू
SFX e ू ्वोः ू
SFX e ू ्वौ ू
SFX e ृ ः ृ
SFX e ृ रः ृ
SFX e ृ रम् ृ
SFX e ृ रि ृ
SFX e ृ रौ ृ
SFX e ृ ा ृ
SFX e ृ ारः ृ
SFX e ृ ारम् ृ
SFX e ृ ाराः ृ
SFX e ृ ारौ ृ
SFX e ृ ुः ृ
SFX e ृ ्रा ृ
SFX e ृ ्रे ृ
SFX e ृ ्रोः ृ
SFX e ै ा: ै
SFX e ै ाभि: ै
SFX e ै ाभ्यः ै
SFX e ै ाभ्याम् ै
SFX e ै ायः ै
SFX e ै ायम् ै
SFX e ै ाया ै
SFX e ै ायाम् ै
SFX e ै ायि ै
SFX e ै ायु ै
SFX e ै ाये ै
SFX e ै ायो: ै
SFX e ै ायौ ै
SFX e ै ासु ै
SFX e ै ि ै
SFX e ै िण: ै
SFX e ै िणः ै
SFX e ै िणा ै
SFX e ै िणि ै
SFX e ै िणी ै
SFX e ै िणे ै
SFX e ै िणो: ै
SFX e ै ीणाम् ै
SFX e ै ीणि ै
SFX e ै े ै
SFX e ो वा ो
SFX e ो वाम् ो
SFX e ो वि ो
SFX e ो वे ो
SFX e ो ाः ो
SFX e ो ाम् ो
SFX e ो ावः ो
SFX e ो ावौ ो
SFX e ो ु ो
SFX e ो ुनः ो
SFX e ो ुना ो
SFX e ो ुनि ो
SFX e ो ुनी ो
SFX e ो ुने ो
SFX e ो ुभि: ो
SFX e ो ुभ्यः ो
SFX e ो ुभ्याम् ो
SFX e ो ुषु ो
SFX e ो ूनाम् ो
SFX e ो ूनि ो
SFX e ो ौः ो
SFX e ौ ावः ौ
SFX e ौ ावम् ौ
SFX e ौ ावा ौ
SFX e ौ ावाम् ौ
SFX e ौ ावि ौ
SFX e ौ ावे ौ
SFX e ौ ावोः ौ
SFX e ौ ु ौ
SFX e ौ ुनः ौ
SFX e ौ ुना ौ
SFX e ौ ुनाम् ौ
SFX e ौ ुनि ौ
SFX e ौ ुनी ौ
SFX e ौ ुने ौ
SFX e ौ ुनो: ौ
SFX e ौ ुभि: ौ
SFX e ौ ुभ्यः ौ
SFX e ौ ुभ्याम् ौ
SFX e ौ ुषु ौ
SFX e ौ ूनि ौ
SFX e ौ ैभिः ौ

ICONV 46
ICONV क्‍ क्
ICONV ख्‍ ख्
ICONV ग्‍ ग्
ICONV घ्‍ घ्
ICONV च्‍ च्
ICONV छ्‍ छ्
ICONV ज्‍ ज्
ICONV झ्‍ झ्
ICONV ट्‍ ट्
ICONV ठ्‍ ठ्
ICONV ड्‍ ड्
ICONV ढ्‍ ढ्
ICONV ण्‍ ण्
ICONV त्‍ त्
ICONV थ्‍ थ्
ICONV द्‍ द्
ICONV ध्‍ ध्
ICONV न्‍ न्
ICONV प्‍ प्
ICONV फ्‍ फ्
ICONV ब्‍ ब्
ICONV भ्‍ भ्
ICONV म्‍ म्
ICONV य्‍ य्
ICONV र्‍ ऱ्
ICONV ल्‍ ल्
ICONV व्‍ व्
ICONV श्‍ श्
ICONV स्‍ स्
ICONV ह्‍ ह्
ICONV ह्र हृ
ICONV ळ्‍ ळ्
ICONV ्‌स ्स
ICONV ॅन् ँ
ICONV ॅण् ँ
ICONV ॅम्प ँप
ICONV क़ क
ICONV ख़ ख
ICONV ग़ ग
ICONV ज़ ज
ICONV ड़ ड
ICONV ढ़ ढ
ICONV फ़ फ
ICONV य़ य
ICONV ऩ न
ICONV ऴ ळ

REP 109
REP र्क ःक
REP र्ख ःख
REP र्च ःच
REP र्छ ःछ
REP र्ट ःट
REP र्ठ ःठ
REP र्त ःत
REP र्थ ःथ
REP र्प ःप
REP र्फ ःफ
REP र्श ःश
REP र्ष ःष
REP र्स ःस
REP ा ां
REP ाना ांना
REP ानो ांनो
REP ानी ांनी
REP ए ॲ
REP रुप$ रूप
REP रुपा रूपा
REP त्व त्त्व
REP क़ क
REP ख़ ख
REP ग़ ग
REP ज़ ज
REP ढ़ ढ
REP ऩ न
REP फ़ फ
REP य़ य
REP ऴ ळ
REP आय ऐ
REP ॆ े
REP ं े
REP ण्  ं
REP न्  ं
REP म्  ं
REP टय़ ट्य
REP ठय़ ठ्य
REP डय़ ड्य
REP ढय़ ढ्य
REP हय़ ह्य
REP दय़ द्य
REP स श
REP स ष
REP श ष
REP प फ
REP ज झ
REP ल ळ
REP न ण
REP त ट
REP ड ढ
REP ण्ट ंट
REP ण्ठ ंठ
REP ण्ड ंड
REP ण्ढ ंढ
REP न्त ंत
REP न्थ ंथ
REP न्द ंद
REP न्ध ंध
REP ध्द द्ध
REP ग्य ज्ञ
REP द्न्य ज्ञ
REP रि ऋ
REP ि ी
REP ी ि
REP ु ू
REP ू ु
REP ॊ ो
REP ो ौ
REP ाे ो
REP ॉं ाँ
REP ाँ ॉं
REP ॅं ँ
REP ंॅ ँ
REP ँ ॅं
REP ाॅ ॉ
REP अॉ ऑ
REP अॅ ॲ
REP अ‍ॅ ॲ
REP : ः
REP ्रु ृ
REP ्रू ृ
REP ै ॅ 
REP स्त्र स्र
REP स्र स्त्र
REP ल लं
REP द्या _द्या
REP या _या
REP त्या त्या_
REP ज्या ज्या_
REP लु लू 
REP वू ऊ
REP उ ऊ
REP ऊ उ
REP रि री
REP र्य ऱ्य
REP र्या ऱ्या
REP र्ह ऱ्ह
REP क्रु कृ
REP क्रू कृ
REP व्रु वृ
REP व्रू वृ 
REP म भ
REP ब ब
REP न्य ऱ्य
REP -य ऱ्य
REP -ह ऱ्ह
REP ऍ अ‍ॅ
REP अा आ
